Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 10 Arkansas Local Police And Fire Retirement System
24-10-602. Annuity generally.

Upon a member's retirement, he or she shall receive an annuity for life in accordance with the applicable benefit program elected by his or her employer, as follows:

Benefit Program 1.

For each year of paid service resulting from employment:

In a position not also covered by Social Security, two and ninety-four hundredths percent (2.94%) of his or her final average pay; and

In a position also covered by Social Security, one and ninety-four hundredths percent (1.94%) of his or her final average pay.

In addition, if the member is retiring as provided in § 24-10-604, § 24-10-605, § 24-10-606, or § 24-10-607, and if the member's age at retirement is less than Social Security's minimum age for an immediate unreduced retirement benefit, then the member shall receive a temporary annuity equal to one percent (1%) of his or her final average pay for each year of paid service resulting from employment in a position also covered by Social Security.

The provisions of this section that allow a member who retires as provided in § 24-10-607, whose employment was also covered by Social Security, and who is thereby eligible for a temporary annuity shall be applied retroactively to all persons who retired under those circumstances on or after October 1, 1989.

The temporary annuity shall terminate at the end of the calendar month in which the earlier of the following events occurs:

The member's death; or

His or her attainment of Social Security's minimum age for an immediate unreduced retirement benefit.

Any member who has had a temporary annuity terminated because of an award of disability retirement under the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., shall have that temporary annuity restored;

Benefit Program 2.

For each year of paid service rendered on or after the election date of the Benefit Program 2 and before the election is rescinded:

In a position also covered by Social Security, two and ninety-four hundredths percent (2.94%) of the member's final average salary; and

In a position not covered by Social Security, three and twenty-eight hundredths percent (3.28%) of the member's final average salary.

For each year of paid service rendered before the election date of the Benefit Program 2 or after the election is rescinded:

In a position also covered by Social Security, one and ninety-four hundredths percent (1.94%) of the member's final average salary; and

In a position not covered by Social Security, two and ninety-four hundredths percent (2.94%) of the member's final average salary.

A member who has paid service rendered before the election date of Benefit Program 2 or after the election is rescinded and subsequently readopted may have the paid service rendered on or after July 28, 1995, treated as though the paid service had been rendered after the election date of Benefit Program 2 by paying to the system the actuarial cost of the increased benefit by a single contribution or by an agreement to pay an increased rate of contributions if approved by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

As used in subdivision (a)(2)(B)(ii) of this section, “actuarial cost” means an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the value of the credited service to be purchased at the time of the purchase, as determined by the system's actuary.

In addition, if the member is retiring as provided in § 24-10-604, § 24-10-605, § 24-10-606, or § 24-10-607, and if the member's age at retirement is less than Social Security's minimum age for an immediate unreduced retirement benefit, then the member shall receive a temporary annuity equal to one percent (1%) of his or her final average pay for each year of paid service rendered before the election date of Benefit Program 2 and resulting from employment in a position also covered by Social Security.

The provisions of this section that allow a member who retires as provided in § 24-10-607, whose employment was also covered by Social Security, and who is thereby eligible for a temporary annuity shall be applied retroactively to all persons who retired under those circumstances on or after October 1, 1989.

The temporary annuity shall terminate at the end of the calendar month in which the earlier of the following events occurs:

The member's death; or

His or her attainment of Social Security's minimum age for an immediate unreduced retirement benefit.

Any member who has had a temporary annuity terminated because of an award of disability retirement under the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., shall have that temporary annuity restored;

As used in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section, “Social Security's minimum age for an immediate unreduced retirement benefit” means one (1) of the following:

If the member is retiring as provided in § 24-10-607 and is in receipt of a disability benefit under the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., the age when the Social Security disability benefit becomes effective;

If the member's retirement is effective before July 1, 2001, as provided in § 24-10-604, § 24-10-605, § 24-10-606, or § 24-10-607, age sixty-two (62); or

If the member's retirement is effective on or after July 1, 2001, as provided in § 24-10-604, § 24-10-605, § 24-10-606, or § 24-10-607, the minimum age for the member's receipt of an immediate unreduced Social Security old age benefit;

Benefit Program 3.

The total benefit amount computed under subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section shall not exceed at the time of retirement one hundred percent (100%) of the final average pay plus the amounts provided in subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this section for volunteer service;

For retirements effective before July 1, 2003, annuity amounts based upon volunteer service shall be in accordance with system provisions in force before July 1, 2003.

For retirements effective July 1, 2003, and the twelve (12) calendar months thereafter, the monthly annuity amount for each year of volunteer service shall be five dollars ($5.00), to a maximum of two hundred dollars ($200) monthly for all volunteer service.

For retirements effective in the twelve (12) calendar months beginning July 1 thereafter, the monthly annuity amount for each year of volunteer service shall be five dollars ($5.00), increased by any percentage increase in the inflation index for the period from December 2003 to the December immediately preceding the July 1, to a maximum for all volunteer service of two hundred dollars ($200) monthly, similarly increased by any percentage increase in the inflation index; and

Benefit Program 4.

For each year of volunteer service rendered on or after the election of Benefit Program 4 and before the election is rescinded:

The total benefit amount computed under subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall not at the time of retirement exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the final average pay plus the amounts provided in subdivision (a)(5)(B) of this section for volunteer service; and

For retirements effective July 1, 2013, the monthly annuity amount for each year of volunteer service shall be ten dollars ($10.00), increased by any percentage increase in the inflation index for the calendar year preceding July 1, to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400) monthly for all volunteer service.

The increased benefit associated with Benefit Program 4 in excess of that defined in Benefit Program 3 shall not be funded through an allocation of premium tax revenues.

The election of Benefit Program 4 may be rescinded only one (1) time by the political subdivision.

A member who has volunteer service rendered before the election date of Benefit Program 4 or after the election is rescinded and subsequently readopted may have the volunteer service rendered on or after July 1, 2013, treated as though the volunteer service had been rendered after the election of Benefit Program 4 by paying to the system the actuarial cost of the increased benefit by a single contribution or by an agreement to pay an increased rate of contributions if approved by the board.

As used in this subdivision (a)(5)(D), “actuarial cost” means an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the value of the credited service to be purchased at the time of the purchase, as determined by the system's actuary.

If each portion of a member's credited service is not covered by the same benefit program, then his or her total annuity for life shall be the total of the annuity for life determined under each applicable benefit program.

Each employer shall have the credited service of each of its members covered by Benefit Program 1 as provided for in this section, unless the employer shall have elected another benefit program provided for in this section.

By majority vote of its governing body, each political subdivision may elect from time to time to cover its members who retire in the future under one (1) of the benefit programs provided for in this section.

The clerk or secretary of the governing body of the political subdivision shall certify, in a manner and form acceptable to the board, the election of the benefit program to the board within ten (10) days of the vote.

The effective date of the political subdivision's benefit program is the first day of the calendar month specified by the governing body, the first day of the calendar month next following receipt by the board of the certification of election of benefit program, or the effective date of the political subdivision's becoming an employer, whichever is the latest date.

The election of Benefit Program 2 may be rescinded only one (1) time by the political subdivision.

If the changed benefit program provides smaller annuities for life than the benefit program previously in effect, then the changed benefit program shall be applicable only to credited service for employment rendered from and after the effective date of the change.

Should an employer change its election of benefit program as provided in this section, the employer contributions shall be correspondingly changed effective the same date as the benefit program change.

The limitation on increases in an employer's contribution provided by § 24-10-405(h) shall not apply to any contribution increase resulting from:

An employer's electing a benefit program that provides larger annuities; and

Increased benefits applicable to retirements on or after July 1, 2001, as provided in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section.

Increases made to a member's annuity benefits under subsection (a) of this section after August 12, 2005, shall result in a corresponding increase in the employer contributions effective on the same date as the member's annuity benefits increase.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1991, No. 428, § 1; 1995, No. 474, § 1; 1997, No. 1242, §§ 1, 2; 1999, No. 869, § 1; 1999, No. 1453, §§ 1, 2; 2001, No. 1133, § 1; 2001, No. 1536, § 1; 2001, No. 1703, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 480, §§ 1-3; 2003, No. 777, § 1; 2003, No. 1367, § 2; 2005, No. 1286, § 1; 2007, No. 294, § 1; 2007, No. 1569, § 1; 2009, No. 720, §§ 2-4; 2013, No. 315, §§ 1, 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1999, No. 1453, § 3 provided:

“The provisions of this act which eliminate the reimbursement requirement shall apply retroactively to allow certain individuals who paid the Local Police and Fire Retirement System for Social Security disabilty benefits to have those benefit reimbursements restored to them upon this act becoming effective.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment made the following substitutions in (a)(1) and (a)(2): substituted “two and ninety-four hundredths percent (2.94%)” for “two and seven-tenths percent (2.7%)” in (a)(1)(A)(i),
“one and ninety-four hundredths percent (1.94%)” for “one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%)” in (a)(1)(A)(ii),
“two and ninety-four hundredths percent (2.94%)” for “two and six-tenths percent (2.6%)” in (a)(2)(A)(i), “three and twenty-eight hundredths percent (3.28%)” for “three and one-tenth percent (3.1%)” in (a)(2)(A)(ii), “one and ninety-four hundredths percent (1.94%)” for “one and seven-tenths percent (1.75)” in (a)(2)(B)(i), and “two and ninety-four hundredths percent (2.94%)” for “two and seven-tenths percent (2.7%)” in (a)(2)(B)(ii); in (a)(4), deleted (a)(4)(B), redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly, inserted “and (2),” substituted “one hundred percent (100%)” for “eighty-five percent (85%)” and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment redesignated former (a)(4) as (a)(4)(A); added “Benefit Program 3” as the subdivision (a)(4) heading; redesignated former (a)(5)(A) and (a)(5)(B) as (a)(4)(B)(i) through (a)(4)(B)(iii); and added (a)(5).

24-10-603. Annuity options.

Before the date the first payment of a member's annuity becomes due, but not thereafter, a member may elect in a manner prescribed by the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System to receive his or her annuity as an Option A60 annuity under this section, or the member may elect to have his or her life annuity reduced, excepting any temporary annuity that may be payable. The member may nominate a beneficiary in accordance with the provisions of one (1) of the following options:

Option A60 — Sixty (60) Months Certain and Life Annuity.

Under Option A60, the retirant shall be paid an annuity for life with the provision that if the retirant's death occurs before sixty (60) monthly payments have been made, the full annuity shall continue to be paid for the remainder of the sixty (60) months to such persons and in such shares as the retirant shall have designated in a manner prescribed by the system and filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

If there is no payee surviving, the lump-sum actuarial equivalent of the remaining monthly payments shall be paid to the estate of the last survivor among the retirant and the designated persons.

The reduced annuity shall be ninety-six percent (96%) of the life annuity if the first payment due date is before July 1, 2001, ninety-seven percent (97%) of the life annuity if the first payment due date is on or after July 1, 2001, or one hundred percent (100%) of the life annuity if the first payment due date is on or after July 1, 2003.

Option A120 — One Hundred Twenty (120) Months Certain and Life Annuity.

Under Option A120, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that if the retirant's death occurs before one hundred twenty (120) monthly payments have been made, the full reduced annuity shall continue to be paid for the remainder of the one hundred twenty (120) months to such persons and in such shares as the retirant shall have designated in a manner prescribed by the system and filed with the board.

If there is no payee surviving, the lump-sum actuarial equivalent of the remaining monthly payments shall be paid to the estate of the last survivor among the retirant and the designated persons.

The reduced annuity shall be ninety percent (90%) of the life annuity if the first payment due date is before July 1, 2001, ninety-five percent (95%) of the life annuity if the first payment due date is on or after July 1, 2001, or ninety-eight percent (98%) of the life annuity if the first payment due date is on or after July 1, 2003.

Option B50 — Fifty Percent (50%) Survivor Beneficiary Annuity.

Under Option B50, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that upon the retirant's death, one-half (½) of the reduced annuity shall be continued throughout the future lifetime of and paid to such person the retirant has designated in a manner prescribed by the system and filed with the board before his or her annuity starting date.

However, the person must be either:

The retirant's spouse for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date;

Another person receiving more than one-half (½) support from the retirant for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date; or

A dependent child as defined under § 24-10-102(13).

If the first payment due date is before July 1, 2001, the reduced annuity to the retirant shall be eighty-five percent (85%) if the retirant's age and his or her beneficiary's age are the same on the first payment due date, which shall be decreased by one-half of one percent (0.5%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age or which shall be increased by one-half of one percent (0.5%) up to a maximum of ninety-five percent (95%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

If the first payment due date is on or after July 1, 2001, the reduced annuity to the retirant shall be ninety-one percent (91%) if the retirant's age and his or her beneficiary's age are the same on the first payment due date, which shall be decreased by one-half of one percent (0.5%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age or which shall be increased by one-half of one percent (0.5%) up to a maximum of ninety-five percent (95%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

If the first payment due date is on or after July 1, 2003, the reduced annuity to the retirant shall be ninety-four percent (94%) if the retirant's age and retirant's beneficiary's age are the same on the first payment due date, which shall be decreased by one-half of one percent (0.5%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age or which shall be increased by one-half of one percent (0.5%) up to a maximum of ninety-eight percent (98%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

Option B75 — Seventy-Five Percent (75%) Survivor Beneficiary Annuity.

Under Option B75, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that upon the retirant's death, three-quarters (¾) of the reduced annuity shall be continued throughout the future lifetime of and paid to such person as the retirant shall have designated in a manner prescribed by the system and filed with the board before the retirant's annuity starting date.

However, the person must be either:

The retirant's spouse for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date;

Another person receiving more than one-half (1/2) support from the retirant for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date; or

A dependent child as defined under § 24-10-102(13).

If the first payment due date is before July 1, 2001, the reduced annuity to the retirant shall be eighty percent (80%) if the retirant's age and his or her beneficiary's age are the same on the first due date, which shall be decreased by three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age or which shall be increased by three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) up to a maximum of ninety percent (90%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

If the first payment due date is on or after July 1, 2001, the reduced annuity to the retirant shall be eighty-six percent (86%) if the retirant's age and his or her beneficiary's age are the same on the first payment due date, which shall be decreased by three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age or which shall be increased by three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) up to a maximum of ninety percent (90%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

If the first payment due date is on or after July 1, 2003, the reduced annuity to the retirant shall be eighty-nine percent (89%) if the retirant's age and the retirant's beneficiary's age are the same on the first payment due date, which shall be decreased by three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age or which shall be increased by three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) up to a maximum of ninety-four percent (94%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

At the election of the retirant, a death of the beneficiary or the divorce or other marriage dissolution after retirement from a spouse designated as beneficiary shall cancel any optional plan elected at retirement to provide continuing lifetime benefits to the beneficiary and shall return the retirant to his or her single lifetime benefit equivalent, to be effective the month following receipt of the retirant's election by the plan.

The election shall be in a manner prescribed by the system.

A retirant who is receiving a single lifetime benefit and who marries after retirement or within the one (1) year immediately preceding retirement may elect to cancel his or her single lifetime benefit and to elect an optional plan providing continuing lifetime benefits to his or her spouse, but only if the election is in a manner approved by the board and is received by the board not earlier than one (1) year after the date of the marriage and not later than eighteen (18) months thereafter.

The election shall be effective the first day of the month following its receipt.

If a member does not elect an option, his or her annuity shall be paid to him or her as an Option A60 annuity provided for under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 2001, No. 769, § 1; 2003, No. 473, §§ 1-5; 2013, No. 40, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “a manner prescribed by the system” for “writing” throughout the section;
in (a)(1)(A)(i), substituted “an” for “a reduced” and deleted “reduced” following “the full”; substituted “has” for “shall have” in (a)(3)(A)(i); substituted “§ 24-10-102(13)” for “§ 24-10-102(11)(B)(ii)” in (a)(3)(A)(ii)

(c)

and (a)(4)(A)(ii)

(c)

; substituted “one half” for “five-tenth” twice in (a)(3)(D); substituted “three-fourths” for “three quarters” in (a)(4)(B) and (a)(4)(C), and for “seventy-five hundredths“ in (a)(4)(D); deleted “written” preceding “election” in (b)(1)(A); added (b)(1)(B); and substituted “in a manner” for “on a form” in (b)(2).

24-10-604. Voluntary retirement.

A member in covered employment may retire with an annuity provided for in § 24-10-602 upon his or her written application to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System setting forth at what time, at least thirty (30) days but not more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing of his or her application, he or she desires to be retired, but only if, at the time of his or her separation from employment and at the time so specified for his or her retirement, the member shall have attained his or her normal retirement age and have five (5) years of credited service in force.

A member hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall accrue ten (10) years of actual service in order to be eligible under this section.

He or she shall have the right to elect an option provided for in § 24-10-603.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1997, No. 1136, § 1; 2013, No. 1065, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added the (1) designation in (a), and substituted “A” for “Any” preceding “member”, “at least” for “not less than” preceding “thirty” and “but not” for “nor” in (a)(1); and added (a)(2).

24-10-605. Compulsory retirement.

A member's employer shall determine the compulsory separation age for its employees.

Upon his or her separation from his or her last covered employment, a member with five (5) or more years of credited service in force who has attained his or her normal retirement age shall receive an annuity provided for in § 24-10-602 and shall have the right to elect an option provided for in § 24-10-603.

A member hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall accrue ten (10) years of actual credited service in order to be eligible under this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1997, No. 1136, § 2; 2013, No. 1065, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (c).

24-10-606. Early retirement.

An active member in covered employment who has not attained his or her normal retirement age may retire with an early annuity as provided in this section upon his or her proper application to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System setting forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing of his or her application, he or she desires to be retired, but only if, at the time of his or her separation from employment and at the time so specified for his or her retirement, the member has:

Attained age fifty (50) and has twenty (20) years of credited service in force; or

Twenty-five (25) years of actual credited paid service in the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System at any age.

He or she shall have the right to elect an option provided for in § 24-10-603.

Upon early retirement, a member shall receive a certain percent of an annuity for life as provided for in § 24-10-602.

The percent shall be one hundred percent (100%) reduced by one-half of one percent (0.5%) multiplied by the number of months by which his or her age at early retirement is less than his or her normal retirement age.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 2009, No. 1317, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 9.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted the (a)(1) designation; and added (a)(2).

The 2013 amendment, in (a), substituted “An active member” for “Any member,” “proper application” for “written application,” and “the member has” for “the member shall have”; substituted “has” for “have” in (a)(1); inserted “actual” in (a)(2); and inserted “as” in (c)(1).

24-10-607. Disability retirement — Definition.

An active member with five (5) years of credited service, including credited service for seventy-five percent (75%) of the two (2) years immediately preceding his or her disability, who while an active member becomes totally and permanently physically or mentally incapacitated for any suitable duty as an employee as a result of a personal injury or disease, may be retired by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System upon proper application filed with the board by or on behalf of the member or former member.

A member hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall accrue ten (10) years of actual service in order to be eligible for retirement.

As used in subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i) of this section, “disease” includes without limitation cancer that a member or volunteer member is diagnosed with while he or she is in the line of duty.

A finding that a member or volunteer member was diagnosed with cancer while he or she was in the line of duty may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence.

As used in subdivision (a)(1)(A)(iii) of this section, “cancer” means:

Leukemia, lymphoma, mesothelioma, or multiple myeloma;

Cancer of the brain, urinary tract, liver, skin, breast, cervix, thyroid, prostate, testicle, colon, or digestive tract; or

A cancer that has been found by research and statistics to show higher instances of occurrence in firefighters than in the general population, if the firefighter was exposed to a known carcinogen, as determined by the Department of Health with consideration to the findings of the International Agency for Research on Cancer, while in the official line of duty.

The employee shall be retired only if, after a medical examination of the member or former member made by or under the direction of a physician or physicians designated by the board, the physician reports to the board in a manner prescribed by the board that the member or former member is physically or mentally totally incapacitated for the further performance of any suitable duty, that the incapacity will probably be permanent, and that the member or former member should be retired.

A proper application to the board by the member or former member or on behalf of the member shall be filed with the board not later than thirty (30) calendar days after the termination of active membership.

The disability annuity shall be effective the first day of the calendar month next following his or her termination of active membership and filing of the proper application with the board.

Upon disability retirement as provided in subsection (a) of this section, a member shall receive an annuity provided for in § 24-10-602.

For purposes of calculating the amount of an annuity for disability retirement, a member's final average pay shall include workers' compensation benefits received by the member as set forth under § 24-10-102(17)(D).

Disability benefits awarded to members before July 16, 2003, shall be adjusted to include workers' compensation benefits in calculating final average pay upon application to the system by the affected member.

An adjustment shall not be made in monthly benefits paid before January 1, 2003.

The member shall have the right to elect an option provided for in § 24-10-603.

The member's disability retirement and annuity shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section and to the provisions of § 24-10-610.

Any active member who while an active member becomes totally and permanently physically or mentally incapacitated for any suitable duty as an employee as the result of a personal injury or disease that the board finds to have arisen out of and in the course of his or her actual performance of duty as an employee may be retired by the board upon proper application filed with the board by or on behalf of the member or former member.

The employee shall be retired only if, after a medical examination of the member or former member made by or under the direction of a physician or physicians designated by the board, the physician reports to the plan in a manner prescribed by the board that the member or former member is physically or mentally totally incapacitated for the further performance of any suitable duty, that the incapacity will probably be permanent, and that the member or former member should be retired.

A proper application to the board by the member or former member or on behalf of the member shall be filed with the board not later than thirty (30) calendar days after the termination of active membership.

The disability annuity shall be effective the first day of the calendar month next following his or her termination of active membership and filing of the proper application with the board.

Upon disability retirement as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a member shall receive an annuity provided for in § 24-10-602.

However, for the sole purpose of computing the amount of the annuity for such a retirant who does not have twenty-five (25) years of credited service in force at the beginning of the disability retirement, credited service shall be granted for the period from the date of disability retirement to the date the retirant would have completed twenty-five (25) years of credited service.

Upon disability retirement as provided in subsection (c) of this section for members in paid service, a member shall receive an annuity provided for in § 24-10-602.

However, for determining the amount of the annuity, the retirant's annuity amount shall either be equal to sixty-five percent (65%) of the final average salary of the member or shall be equal to the annuity paid to retirants for each year of paid service resulting from employment as provided for in § 24-10-602, whichever is greater.

The retirant shall have the right to elect an option provided for in § 24-10-603.

The retirant's disability retirement and annuity shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section and to the provisions of § 24-10-610.

At least one (1) time each year during the first five (5) years following a member's retirement on account of disability and at least one (1) time in each three-year period thereafter, the board may require any disability retirant who has not attained age fifty-five (55) to undergo a medical examination to be made by or under the direction of a physician or physicians designated by the board.

If the retirant refuses to submit to the medical examination in any period, his or her disability annuity may be suspended by the board until his or her withdrawal of his or her refusal.

If his or her refusal continues for one (1) year, all his or her rights in and to a disability annuity may be revoked by the board.

If, upon the medical examination of the retirant, the physician reports to the board that the retirant is physically and mentally able and capable of resuming suitable duty as an employee, his or her disability retirement shall terminate.

If the former disability retirant does not immediately again become an employee, then, for the purpose of determining his or her eligibility for any other system benefit, he or she shall be considered to have terminated active membership as of the time of disability retirement, but for a reason other than disability or death.

If the former disability retirant immediately again becomes an employee, he or she shall immediately again become a member of the system, and his or her credited service at the time of his or her disability retirement shall be restored to his or her credit.

He or she shall be given service credit for the period he or she was in receipt of the disability annuity.

Should the former disability retirant again become totally and permanently disabled within two (2) years immediately following his or her return to membership, the seventy-five percent (75%) credited service requirement specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be waived.

Beginning July 1, 2003, subdivision (d)(2) of this section shall apply retroactively to allow members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System who received a disability retirement before July 1, 2001, to receive the greater benefit of sixty-five percent (65%) of the final average salary of the member or an amount equal to the annuity paid to retirants for each year of paid service resulting from employment.

However, the system shall not be responsible for making benefit payments retroactive to the effective date of the disability.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1989, No. 9, §§ 1, 2; 1993, No. 1199, § 1; 1995, No. 643, § 1; 2001, No. 1132, § 1; 2003, No. 481, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 507, § 2; 2003, No. 1367, §§ 3, 4; 2013, No. 40, § 10; 2013, No. 1065, § 7; 2019, No. 178, §§ 4-7; 2019, No. 638, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 40 substituted “proper application” for “written application” and “a manner prescribed by the board” for “writing” throughout the section; substituted “An active member” for “Any member” in (a)(1)(A); substituted “§ 24-10-102(17)(D)” for “§ 24-10-102(15)(D)” in (b)(1)(B)(i); substituted “before” for “prior to” in (b)(1)(B)(ii); substituted “An adjustment shall not” for “No adjustment shall” in (b)(1)(B(iii); substituted “The member” for “He or she” in (b)(2); and substituted “The member's” for “His or her” in (b)(3).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1065 added the (i) designation in (a)(1)(A) and added (a)(1)(A)(ii); and substituted “board” for “plan” in (a)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 178 substituted “thirty (30) calendar days” for “one (1) year” in (a)(2) and (c)(2); and rewrote (a)(3) and (c)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 638 added (a)(1)(A)(iii) and (a)(1)(A)(iv).